California, session 20252026, SB248.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 28222 is added to the Penal Code, to read:28222. Beginning July 1, 2027, the department shall mail a letter to the listed residential address of each purchaser of a firearm within 10 days of each purchaser making an application and of any person who notifies the department pursuant to Section 27560, 27875, 27920, or 28000. 28000, within 10 days of being notified. This letter shall include all of the following and any other information the department deems relevant to firearm ownership:(a) The importance of secure storage of firearms, including, at a minimum, a summary of applicable secure storage and child access prevention laws.(b) Overview of basic state and federal laws and obligations related to gun ownership and possession in California.(c) Information and data about the risks of gun ownership purchase, ownership, and possession.(d) Information on how to legally transfer or relinquish a firearm.(e) Information and resources regarding gun violence restraining orders.(f) Information and resources related to suicide prevention.(g) Information and resources related to domestic violence.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 3.___________________